USR-to-hindi/apertium_hn_canonical_LC.dix
<pardef n="/mEM__p">
<e><p><l>mEM</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mEM</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mEMne</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mEMne</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJe</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJe</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>muJako</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>muJako</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJase</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJase</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJameM</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJameM_se</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJameM</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJameM_se</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJapara</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJapara</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hama</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hama</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamane</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamane</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hameM</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hameM</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>hamako</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>hamako</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamase</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamase</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamameM</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamameM_se</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamameM</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamameM_se</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamapara</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamapara</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>merA</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mere</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mere</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mere</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>merI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>merI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>merI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>merI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<!--  Added parsarg: kI for following patterns -->
<e><p><l>merI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:kI"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamArI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:kI"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>mere</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mere</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>hamArA</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamAre</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamAre</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamAre</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamArI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamArI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamArI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamArI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>

<!-- Added by Shirisha Manju -->
<e><p><l>hamAre</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamAre</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<!--  -->
</pardef>

<pardef n="regular__adj-noun">
 <e>           <p><l></l>      <r></r></p><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
 <e>           <p><l></l>      <r></r></p><par n="kAl/A__n"/></e>
<!--  <e>           <p><l></l>      <r></r></p><par n="vAl/A__n"/></e> -->
<!--  <e>           <p><l></l>      <r></r></p><par n="vAl/A__adj"/></e> -->
  <e>           <p><l></l>      <r></r></p><par n="ladak/A__n"/></e>
  <e>           <p><l></l>      <r></r></p><par n="ladak/I__n"/></e>
  </pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="addA"><i>add</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="akarmA"><i>akarm</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="amarIkI"><i>amarIkI</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="anabyAhA"><i>anabyAh</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="annapUrNA"><i>annapUrN</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="arodA"><i>arodZ</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="aXakacarA"><i>aXakacar</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="azgUTA"><i>azgUT</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="badAGarAnA"><i>badAGarAn</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="BagOnA"><i>BagOn</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="bAjA"><i>bAj</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="bambA"><i>bamb</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="barAbarakA"><i>barAbarak</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="baswA"><i>basw</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="baXiyA"><i>baXiy</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="bedA"><i>bed</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="betevAlA"><i>betevAl</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="binOlA"><i>binOl</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="BoMdA"><i>BoMd</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="bUDA"><i>bUDZ</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="cakawwA"><i>cakaww</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="cataKArA"><i>cataKAr</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="cipakanevAlA"><i>cipakanevAl</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="cOpAyA"><i>cOpAy</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="CuttA"><i>Cutt</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="ekamaFjilA"><i>ekamaFjil</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="gamalA"><i>gamal</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="gaXA"><i>gaX</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="gorillA"><i>gorill</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="gUzgA"><i>gUzg</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="haWakarA"><i>haWakar</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="ikatTA"><i>ikatT</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="JaNdA"><i>JaNd</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="jiwanA"><i>jiwan</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="kadAhA"><i>kadAh</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="kAmalA"><i>kAmal</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="KArA"><i>KAr</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="kavayiwA"><i>kavayiw</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="kiwAbIkIdA"><i>kiwAbIkId</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="kullA"><i>kull</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="lakadabagGA"><i>lakadabagG</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="luNdA"><i>luNd</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="maMsUbA"><i>maMsUb</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="matTA"><i>matT</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="mEM"><i></i><par n="/mEM__p"/></e>
<e lm="mohallA"><i>mohall</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="muKOtA"><i>muKOt</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="nakatA"><i>nakat</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="nivqwwAwmA"><i>nivqwwAwm</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="PAkA"><i>PAk</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="parakatA"><i>parakat</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="patuA"><i>patu</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="piCalagA"><i>piCalag</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="praswowA"><i>praswow</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="pyAlA"><i>pyAl</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="ravEyA"><i>ravEy</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="sagA"><i>sag</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="saMsqRtakarmA"><i>saMsqRtakarm</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="sawarafgA"><i>sawarafg</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="siPAriSanAmA"><i>siPAriSanAm</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="suWarA"><i>suWar</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="TozgA"><i>Tozg</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="vAkprasArI"><i>vAkprasArI</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="wAjiyA"><i>wAjiy</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="wEsI"><i>wEsI</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="xaliyA"><i>xaliy</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="xilarubA"><i>xilarub</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
<e lm="XUmaXadakkA"><i>XUmaXadakk</i><par n="regular__adj-noun"/></e>
